Rhode Island, session 2025, SB144.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-20. Sale or possession of silencers.
(a) It shall be unlawful within this state to manufacture, sell, purchase, or possess and/or
use a firearm, with an overall length of less than seventeen inches (17”), which has attached any
muffler, silencer, or device for deadening or muffling the sound of a firearm when discharged;
provided, however, that law enforcement officers utilizing said devices while acting within the
scope of their official duties, as tactical teams and under the direct supervision of the police chief
or the colonel of the state police or their designee, shall not be in violation of this section.
(b) Violations of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year
and one day.
SECTION 2. Chapter 20-13 of the General Laws entitled "Hunting and Hunting Safety" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
20-13-19. Hunting with suppressors.
(a) Any individual in lawful possession of a device that will silence, suppress or muffle the
sound or natural report of a rifle or shotgun when the rifle or shotgun is discharged, may, at the
individual’s sole discretion, use such device to hunt any game for which the individual is licensed,
provided the host rifle or shotgun to which the device is attached is permitted pursuant to § 20-13-
13.

(b) No city, town, committee, board, or other state or local agency may enact rules,
regulations, or ordinances requiring or any other manner, mandating the use of a device that will
silence, suppress, or muffle the sound or natural report of a rifle or shotgun.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000356
========
LC000356 - Page 2 of 3